Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2256.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5723XS (9) 91 ms/md S.F. 2256 Section 1. Section 331.606B, subsection 2, paragraph b, 1 Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. For any instrument of conveyance, the name of the 3 taxpayer and a complete mailing address. For a taxpayer that 4 is an individual, the name of the taxpayer shall include the 5 full first and full last legal names of each taxpayer. 6 Sec. 2. Section 445.5, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 7 to read as follows: 8 1. a. As soon as practicable after receiving the tax list 9 prescribed in chapter 443 , the county treasurer shall deliver 10 to the titleholder, by regular mail, or if requested by the 11 titleholder, by electronic transmission, a statement of taxes 12 due and payable which shall include the following information: 13 a. (1) The year of tax. 14 b. (2) A description of the parcel. 15 c. (3) The assessed value of the parcel, itemized by the 16 value for land, dwellings, and buildings, for the current 17 year and the previous year as valued by the assessor after 18 application of any equalization orders. 19 d. (4) The taxable value of the parcel, itemized by the 20 value for land, dwellings, and buildings, for the current year 21 and the previous year after application of any equalization 22 orders, assessment limitations, and itemized valuation 23 exemptions. 24 e. (5) The complete name of all taxing authorities 25 receiving a tax distribution, the amount of the distribution, 26 and the percentage distribution for each named authority, 27 listed from the highest to the lowest distribution percentage. 28 f. (6) The consolidated levy rate for one thousand dollars 29 of taxable valuation multiplied by the taxable valuation to 30 produce the gross taxes levied before application of credits 31 against levied taxes for the previous and current fiscal years. 32 g. (7) The itemized credits against levied taxes deducted 33 from the gross taxes levied in order to produce the net taxes 34 owed for the previous and current fiscal years. 35 -1- LSB 5723XS (9) 91 ms/md 1/ 3 S.F. 2256 h. (8) The total amount of taxes levied by each taxing 1 authority in the previous fiscal year and the current fiscal 2 year and the difference between the two amounts, expressed as a 3 percentage increase or decrease. 4 b. The statements of taxes due and payable for all parcels 5 having an identical mailing address may be combined by the 6 county treasurer or county auditor into a single envelope or 7 mail item. 8 Sec. 3. IMPLEMENTATION. For parcels owned by a taxpayer who 9 is an individual, if the county system, as defined in section 10 445.1, does not contain the full legal name of each individual 11 titleholder, the county treasurer shall, within one year of the 12 effective date of this Act, attempt to contact the titleholder 13 by mail, electronic mail, or phone to notify them of the 14 missing or incomplete information in the county system and 15 request that the titleholder provide such missing or incomplete 16 information. The county is not responsible for any taxpayer 17 liability relating to parcels having missing or incomplete 18 information in the county system if the county attempted to 19 contact the titleholder within the applicable time period and 20 documents such efforts. 21